Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-3139
Health Care Homes for the Medically Underserved Fund; created; purpose; investment.

The Health Care Homes for the Medically Underserved Fund is created within the Department of Health and Human Services. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The purpose of the fund is to enhance the ability of Nebraska's federally qualified health centers to provide patient-centered medical homes to low-income medically underserved populations.

Laws 2015, LB661, § 18.
May 21, 2015
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.